Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
ARTICLE 31
FIRE - POLICE - NEW HIRE PENSION PLANS

Editor's note:

This article was added with relocations in 1996 containing provisions of some sections formerly located in parts 3 to 10 of article 30 of this title. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated.

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 ADMINISTRATION

PART 3 FIRE AND POLICE MEMBERS'
BENEFIT FUND

PART 4 STATEWIDE DEFINED BENEFIT PLAN

PART 5 STATEWIDE MONEY PURCHASE PLAN

PART 6 WITHDRAWN LOCAL ALTERNATIVE
PENSION PLAN

PART 7 AFFILIATION OF PLANS WITH
THE ASSOCIATION

PART 8 DISABILITY AND SURVIVOR BENEFITS

PART 9 SUPPLEMENTAL PROGRAMS

PART 10 POLICE OFFICERS' AND FIREFIGHTERS'
PENSION REFORM COMMISSION

PART 11 ALTERNATIVES FOR MONEY PURCHASE PLAN MEMBERS

PART 12 ENSURING PROPER PAYMENTS